Washington statutes.
RCW 46.04.540

Sidewalk.

"Sidewalk" means that property between the curb lines or the lateral lines of a roadway and the adjacent property, set aside and intended for the use of pedestrians or such portion of private property parallel and in proximity to a public highway and dedicated to use by pedestrians.

[ 1961 c 12 s 46.04.540. Prior: 1959 c 49 s 58; prior: 1937 c 189 s 1, part; RRS s 6360-1, part.]